District of Columbia statutes.
31-3608

Monthly reports.

Any time a long-term care benefit which is funded through a life insurance vehicle by the acceleration of the death benefit is in benefit payment status, a monthly report shall be provided to the policyholder. The monthly report shall include the following:

(1)

Any long-term care benefits paid out during the month;

(2)

An explanation of any changes in the policy (e.g., death benefits or cash values due to long-term care benefits being paid out); and

(3)

The amount of long-term care benefits existing or remaining.

History

May 23, 2000, D.C. Law 13-121, § 9, 47 DCR 2038